California statutes. Penal Code
 who may have a property interest in the alleged proceeds. The notice shall state that any interested party may file a verified claim with the superior court stating the amount of his or her claimed interest and an affirmation or denial of the prosecuting agency’s allegation. If the notice cannot be given by registered mail or personal delivery, the notice shall be published for at least three successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the property is located. All notices shall set forth the time within which a claim of interest in the property seized is required to be filed.

(d) (1) Any person claiming an interest in the property or proceeds may, at any time within 30 days from the date of the first publication of the notice of seizure, or within 30 days after receipt of actual notice, file with the superior court of the county in which the action is pending a verified claim stating his or
 her interest in the property or proceeds. A verified copy of the claim shall be given by the claimant to the Attorney General or district attorney, county counsel, or city attorney, as appropriate.

(2) If, at the end of the time set forth in paragraph (1), an interested person has not filed a claim, the court, upon motion, shall declare that the person has defaulted upon his or her alleged interest, and it shall be subject to forfeiture upon proof of compliance with subdivision (c).

(e) The burden is on the petitioner to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that matter is subject to forfeiture pursuant to this section.

(f) It is not necessary to seek or obtain a criminal conviction prior to the entry of an order for the destruction of matter pursuant to this section. Any matter described in subdivision (a) that is in the
 possession of any city, county, city and county, or state official or agency, including found property, or property obtained as the result of a case in which no trial was had or that has been disposed of by way of dismissal or otherwise than by way of conviction may be ordered destroyed.

(g) A court order for destruction of matter described in subdivision (a) may be carried out by a police or sheriff’s department or by the Department of Justice. The court order shall specify the agency responsible for the destruction.

(h) As used in this section, “matter” means any picture, photograph, image, motion picture, video tape, film, filmstrip, negative, slide, photocopy, or other pictorial representation, recording, or electrical reproduction. “Matter” also means any data storage media that contains the image at issue, but does not include the computer, camera, telecommunication or
 electronic device, unless the matter consists solely of electronic information stored on a device that cannot be altered or erased.

(i) Prior for granting an order for destruction of matter pursuant to this section, the court may require the petitioner to demonstrate that the petition covers no more property than necessary to remove possession of the offending matter.

(j) It is a defense in any forfeiture proceeding that the matter seized was lawfully possessed in aid of legitimate scientific or educational purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 291, Sec. 2.   (SB 676)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

647.9.

(a) A first responder, operating under color of authority, who responds to the scene of an accident or crime and captures the photographic image of a deceased person by any means, including, but not limited to, by use of a personal electronic device or a device belonging to their employing agency, for any purpose other than an official law enforcement purpose or a genuine public
 interest is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation.

(b) An agency that employs first responders shall, on January 1, 2021, notify its employees who are first responders of the prohibition imposed by this section.

(c) For purposes of this section, “first responder” means a state or local peace officer, paramedic, emergency medical technician, rescue service personnel, emergency manager, firefighter, coroner, or employee of a coroner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 219, Sec. 1.   (AB 2655)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

647a.

(a) Any peace officer, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 830.1 or Section 830.31, 830.32, or 830.33, may transport any person, as quickly as is feasible, to the nearest homeless shelter, or any runaway youth or youth in crisis to the nearest runaway shelter, if the officer inquires whether the person desires the transportation, and the person does not object to the transportation. Any officer exercising due care and precaution shall not be liable for any damages or injury incurred during transportation.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this section shall become operative in a county only if the board of supervisors adopts the provisions of this section by ordinance. The ordinance shall include a provision requiring peace officers to determine the availability of space at the nearest homeless or runaway shelter prior to transporting any person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1065, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

647b.

Every person who loiters about any school in which adults are in attendance at courses established pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 52500) of Part 28 of the Education Code, and who annoys or molests any person in attendance therein shall be punished by a fine of not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not exceeding six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 42.)
-------------------------------------------

647c.

Every person who willfully and maliciously obstructs the free movement of any person on any street, sidewalk, or other public place or on or in any place open to the public is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Nothing in this section affects the power of a county or a city to regulate conduct upon a street, sidewalk, or other public place or on or in a place open to the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 122.)
-------------------------------------------

647d.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, subdivision (b) shall become operative in a county only if the board of supervisors adopts the provisions of subdivision (b) by ordinance after a finding that sufficient alcohol treatment and recovery facilities exist or will exist to accommodate the persons described in that subdivision.

(b) In any accusatory pleading charging a violation of subdivision (f) of Section 647, if the defendant has been previously convicted two or more times of a violation of subdivision (f) of Section 647 within the previous 12 months, each such
 previous conviction shall be charged in the accusatory pleading. If two or more of the previous convictions are found to be true by the jury, upon a jury trial, or by the court, upon a court trial, or are admitted by the defendant, the defendant shall be imprisoned in the county jail for a period of not less than 90 days. The trial court may grant probation or suspend the execution of sentence imposed upon the defendant if the court, as a condition of the probation or suspension, orders the defendant to spend 60 days in an alcohol treatment and recovery program in a facility which, as a minimum, meets the standards described in the guidelines for alcoholic recovery home programs issued by the Division of Alcohol Programs of the Department of Alcohol and Drug Abuse.

(c) The provisions of Section 4019 shall apply to the conditional attendance of an alcohol treatment and recovery program described in subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1009, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

647e.

(a) A city, county, or city and county may by local ordinance provide that no person who has in his or her possession any bottle, can or other receptacle containing any alcoholic beverage which has been opened, or a seal broken, or the contents of which have been partially removed, shall enter, be, or remain on the posted premises of, including the posted parking lot immediately adjacent to, any retail package off-sale alcoholic beverage licensee licensed pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 23000) of the Business and Professions Code, or on any public sidewalk immediately adjacent to the licensed and
 posted premises. Any person violating any provision of such an ordinance shall be guilty of an infraction.

(b) As used in subdivision (a), “posted premises” means those premises which are subject to licensure under any retail package off-sale alcoholic beverage license, the parking lot immediately adjacent to the licensed premises and any public sidewalk immediately adjacent to the licensed premises on which clearly visible notices indicate to the patrons of the licensee and parking lot and to persons on the public sidewalk, that the provisions of subdivision (a) are applicable. Any local ordinance adopted pursuant to this section shall require posting of the premises.

(c) The provisions of this section shall not apply to a private residential parking lot which is immediately adjacent to the posted premises.

Nothing in this section shall
 affect the power of a county or a city, or city and county, to regulate the possession of an opened alcoholic beverage in any public place or in a place open to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 514, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

648.

Every person who makes, issues, or puts in circulation any bill, check, ticket, certificate, promissory note, or the paper of any bank, to circulate as money, except as authorized by the laws of the United States, for the first offense, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and for each and every subsequent offense, is guilty of felony.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

648a.

(a) Every person who has in his or her possession for any illegal purpose or who makes, sells, issues, or puts in circulation any slug or token that does not conform to the limitations on size, shape, weight, construction, and use specified in subdivision (b) is guilty of a misdemeanor. The term “slug” and the term “token,” as used in this section, mean any piece of metal or other material not a coin of the United States or a foreign country. However, tokens sold by and accepted as fares by electric railways and lettered checks having a
 returnable trade value shall not be subject to the provisions of this section.

(b) (1) The slug or token shall either be clearly identified with the name and location of the establishment from which it originates on at least one side or shall contain an identifying mark or logo that clearly indicates the identity of the manufacturer.

(2) The slug or token shall not be within any of the following diameter ranges in inches:

(A) 0.680-0.775.

(B) 0.810-0.860.

(C) 0.910-0.980.

(D) 1.018-1.068.

(E) 1.180-1.230.

(F) 1.475-1.525.

(3) The slug or token shall not be manufactured from a three-layered material consisting of a copper-nickel alloy clad on both sides of a pure core, nor from a copper-based material except if the total of zinc, nickel, aluminum, magnesium, and other alloying materials is at least 20 percent of the token’s weight.

(4) The slug or token shall not possess sufficient magnetic properties so as to be accepted by a coin mechanism.

(5) The design on the slug or token shall not resemble any current or past foreign or United States coinage.

(6) Establishments using these slugs or tokens shall prominently and conspicuously post signs on their premises notifying patrons that federal law
 prohibits the use of the slugs or tokens outside the premises for any monetary purpose.

(7) The issuing establishment shall not accept slugs or tokens as payment for any goods or services offered by the establishment with the exception of the specific use for which the slugs or tokens were designed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 354, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

649.

Any person engaged in the transportation of persons by taxicab or other means of conveyance who knowingly misdirects a prospective guest of any hotel, inn, boardinghouse or lodginghouse or knowingly takes such a prospective guest to a hotel, inn, boardinghouse or lodginghouse different from that of his instructions from such prospective guest is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

649a.

Any person engaged in the operation of any hotel, inn, boardinghouse or lodginghouse who pays another any compensation for inducing or attempting to induce, by false statement or misrepresentation, prospective guests of a given hotel, inn, boardinghouse or lodginghouse to enter, lodge at or become a guest of any other hotel, inn, boardinghouse or lodginghouse is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

651.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to buy, receive, sell, give away, dispose of, exchange or barter any Federal order stamps except for the foods or cotton goods for which they are issued.

This section does not apply to any person buying, receiving, selling, giving away, disposing of, exchanging or bartering any Federal order stamps subsequent to the redemption of such stamps in the manner provided by State or Federal law for the foods or cotton goods for which they are issued.

As used in this section, Federal order stamps refers to stamps issued by the United States Department of Agriculture or
 its duly authorized agent for food and surplus food or cotton and surplus cotton.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

652.

(a) It shall be an infraction for any person to perform or offer to perform body piercing upon a person under the age of 18 years, unless the body piercing is performed in the presence of, or as directed by a notarized writing by, the person’s parent or guardian.

(b) This section does not apply to the body piercing of an emancipated minor.

(c) As used in this section, “body piercing” means the creation of an opening
 in the body of a human being for the purpose of inserting jewelry or other decoration, including, but not limited to, the piercing of a lip, tongue, nose, or eyebrow. “Body piercing” does not include the piercing of an ear.

(d) Neither the minor upon whom the body piercing was performed, nor the parent or guardian of that minor, nor any other minor is liable for punishment under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 502.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

653.

Every person who tattoos or offers to tattoo a person under the age of 18 years is guilty of a misdemeanor.

As used in this section, to “tattoo” means to insert pigment under the surface of the skin of a human being, by pricking with a needle or otherwise, so as to produce an indelible mark or figure visible through the skin.

This section is not intended to apply to any act of a licensed practitioner of the healing arts performed in the course of his practice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1422.)
-------------------------------------------

653b.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) or (c), every person who loiters about any school or public place at or near which children attend or normally congregate and who remains at any school or public place at or near which children attend or normally congregate, or who reenters or comes upon a school or place within 72 hours, after being asked to leave by the chief administrative official of that school
 or, in the absence of the chief administrative official, the person acting as the chief administrative official, or by a member of the security patrol of the school district who has been given authorization, in writing, by the chief administrative official of that school to act as his or her agent in performing this duty, or a city police officer, or sheriff or deputy sheriff, or Department of the California Highway Patrol peace officer is a vagrant, and is punishable by a fine of not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in a county jail for a period not exceeding six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) Every person required to register as a sex offender who violates subdivision (a) shall be punished as follows:

(1) Upon a first conviction, by a fine not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000), by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of
 not more than six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(2) If the defendant has been previously convicted once of a violation of this section or former Section 653g, by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not less than 10 days or more than six months, or by both imprisonment and a fine of not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000), and shall not be released on probation, parole, or any other basis until he or she has served at least 10 days.

(3) If the defendant has been previously convicted two or more times of a violation of this section or former Section 653g, by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not less than 90 days or more than six months, or by both imprisonment and a fine of not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000), and shall not be released on probation, parole, or any other basis until he or she has served at least 90 days.

(c) Any person required to register with the chief of police or sheriff pursuant to Section 186.30 who violates subdivision (a) shall be punished as follows:

(1) Upon first conviction, by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(2) Upon a second conviction, by a fine not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000), by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment. The court shall consider a period of imprisonment of at least 10 days.

(3) If the defendant has been previously convicted two or more times, by a fine not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000), by imprisonment in a
 county jail for a period of not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment. The court shall consider a period of imprisonment of at least 90 days.

(d) As used in this section, “loiter” means to delay, to linger, or to idle about a school or public place without lawful business for being present.

(e) Nothing in this section shall preclude or prohibit prosecution under any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 592, Sec. 1.   (SB 492)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

653c.

(a) No person required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 for an offense committed against an elder or dependent adult, as defined in Section 368, other than a resident of the facility, shall enter or remain on the grounds of a day care or residential facility where elders or dependent adults are regularly present or living, without having registered with the facility administrator or his or her designees, except to proceed expeditiously to the office of the facility administrator or designee for the purpose of
 registering.

(b) In order to register pursuant to subdivision (a), a sex offender shall advise the facility administrator or designee that he or she is a sex offender; provide his or her name, address, and purpose for entering the facility; and provide proof of identity.

(c) The facility administrator may refuse to register, impose restrictions on registration, or revoke the registration of a sex offender if he or she has a reasonable basis for concluding that the offender’s presence or acts would disrupt, or have disrupted, the facility, any resident, employee, volunteer, or visitor; would result, or has resulted, in damage to property; the offender’s presence at the facility would interfere, or has interfered, with the peaceful conduct of the activities of the facility; or would otherwise place at risk the facility, or any employee, volunteer or visitor.

(d) Punishment for any violation of this section shall be as follows:

(1) Upon a first conviction by a fine of not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000), by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not more than six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(2) If the defendant has been previously convicted once of a violation of this section, by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not less than 10 days or more than six months, or by both imprisonment and a fine of not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000), and shall not be released on probation, parole, or any other basis until he or she has served at least 10 days.

(3) If the defendant has been previously convicted two or more times of a violation of this section, by imprisonment
 in a county jail for a period of not less than 90 days or more than six months, or by both imprisonment and a fine of not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000), and shall not be released on probation, parole, or any other basis until he or she has served at least 90 days.

(e) Nothing in this section shall preclude or prohibit prosecution under any other provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 337, Sec. 28.   Effective September 20, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

653d.

Every person who sells machinery used or to be used for mining purposes who fails to give to the buyer, at the time of sale, a bill of sale for the machinery, or who fails to keep a written record of the sale, giving the date thereof, describing the machinery, and showing the name and address of the buyer, and every buyer of such machinery, if in this State, who fails to keep a record of his purchase of such machinery, giving the name and address of the seller, describing the machinery, and showing the date of the purchase, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 222.)
-------------------------------------------

653f.

(a) Every person who, with the intent that the crime be committed, solicits another to offer, accept, or join in the offer or acceptance of a bribe, or to commit or join in the commission of carjacking, robbery, burglary, grand theft, receiving stolen property, extortion, perjury, subornation of perjury, forgery, kidnapping, arson or assault with a deadly weapon or instrument or by means of force likely to produce great bodily injury, or, by the use of force or a threat of force, to prevent or dissuade any person who is or may become a witness from attending upon, or testifying at, any trial, proceeding, or inquiry authorized by law, shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of
 Section 1170, or by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or the amount which could have been assessed for commission of the offense itself, whichever is greater, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(b) Every person who, with the intent that the crime be committed, solicits another to commit or join in the commission of murder shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for three, six, or nine years.

(c) Every person who, with the intent that the crime be committed, solicits another to commit rape by force or violence, sodomy by force or violence, oral copulation by force or violence, or any violation of Section 264.1, 288, or 289, shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for two, three, or four years.

(d) (1) Every person who, with the intent that the crime be committed, solicits another to commit an offense specified in Section 11352, 11379, 11379.5, 11379.6, or 11391 of the Health and Safety Code shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months. Every person who, having been convicted of soliciting another to commit an offense specified in this subdivision, is subsequently convicted of the proscribed solicitation, shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(2) This subdivision does not apply where the term of imprisonment imposed under other provisions of law would result in a longer term of imprisonment.

(e) Every person who, with the intent that the crime be committed, solicits another to commit an offense specified in Section 14014 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for not exceeding six months. Every person who, having been convicted of soliciting another to commit an offense specified in this subdivision, is subsequently convicted of the proscribed solicitation, shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(f) (1) Every person who, with the intent that the crime be committed, solicits another to commit an offense set forth in Section 502 shall be punished as set forth in paragraph (3).

(2) Every person who, with the
 intent that the crime be committed, offers to solicit assistance for another to conduct activities in violation of Section 502 shall be punished as set forth in paragraph (3). This includes persons operating Internet Web sites that offer to assist others in locating hacking services. For the purposes of this section “hacking services” means assistance in the unauthorized access to computers, computer systems, or data in violation of Section 502.

(3) Every person who violates this subdivision shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for a period not to exceed six months. Every subsequent violation of this subdivision by that same person shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year.

(g) An offense charged in violation of subdivision
 (a), (b), or (c) shall be proven by the testimony of two witnesses, or of one witness and corroborating circumstances. An offense charged in violation of subdivision (d), (e), or (f) shall be proven by the testimony of one witness and corroborating circumstances.

(h) Nothing in this section precludes prosecution under any other law that provides for a greater punishment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 552, Sec. 1.   (AB 195)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

653h.

(a) Every person is guilty of a public offense punishable as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), who:

(1) Knowingly and willfully transfers or causes to be transferred any sounds that have been recorded on a phonograph record, disc, wire, tape, film or other article on which sounds are recorded, with intent to sell or cause to be sold, or to use or cause to be used for commercial advantage or private financial gain through public performance, the article on which the sounds are so transferred, without the consent of the owner.

(2) Transports for monetary or like consideration within this state or causes to be transported within this state any such article
 with the knowledge that the sounds thereon have been so transferred without the consent of the owner.

(b) Any person who has been convicted of a violation of subdivision (a), shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year, by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three, or five years, or by a fine not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment, if the offense involves the transfer or transportation, or conduct causing that transfer or transportation, of not less than 1,000 of the articles described in subdivision (a).

(c) Any person who has been convicted of any other violation of subdivision (a) not described in subdivision (b), shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year, or by a fine of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or by both
 that fine and imprisonment. A second or subsequent conviction under subdivision (a) not described in subdivision (b) shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 or by a fine not to exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(d) Every person who offers for sale or resale, or sells or resells, or causes the sale or resale, or rents, or possesses for these purposes, any article described in subdivision (a) with knowledge that the sounds thereon have been so transferred without the consent of the owner is guilty of a public offense.

(1) A violation of subdivision (d) involving not less than 100 of those articles shall be punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year or by a fine not to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment. A second or subsequent
 conviction for the conduct described in this paragraph shall be punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(2) A person who has been convicted of any violation of this subdivision not described in paragraph (1) shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six months or by a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment. A second conviction for the conduct described in this paragraph shall be punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year or by a fine not to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment. A third or subsequent conviction for the conduct described in this paragraph shall be punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year
 or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(e) As used in this section, “person” means any individual, partnership, partnership’s member or employee, corporation, limited liability company, association or corporation or association employee, officer or director; “owner” means the person who owns the original master recording embodied in the master phonograph record, master disc, master tape, master film or other article used for reproducing recorded sounds on phonograph records, discs, tapes, films or other articles on which sound is or can be recorded, and from which the transferred recorded sounds are directly or indirectly derived; and “master recording” means the original fixation of sounds upon a recording from which copies can be made.

(f) This section shall neither
 enlarge nor diminish the right of parties in private litigation.

(g) This section does not apply to any person engaged in radio or television broadcasting who transfers, or causes to be transferred, any such sounds (other than from the sound track of a motion picture) intended for, or in connection with, broadcast transmission or related uses, or for archival purposes.

(h) This section does not apply to any not-for-profit educational institution or any federal or state governmental entity, if the institution or entity has as a primary purpose the advancement of the public’s knowledge and the dissemination of information regarding America’s musical cultural heritage, provided that this purpose is clearly set forth in the institution’s or entity’s charter, bylaws, certificate of incorporation, or similar document, and the institution or entity has, prior to the transfer, made a good
 faith effort to identify and locate the owner or owners of the sound recordings to be transferred and, provided that the owner or owners could not be and have not been located. Nothing in this section shall be construed to relieve an institution or entity of its contractual or other obligation to compensate the owners of sound recordings to be transferred. In order to continue the exemption permitted by this subdivision, the institution or entity shall make continuing efforts to locate such owners and shall make an annual public notice of the fact of the transfers in newspapers of general circulation serving the jurisdictions where the owners were incorporated or doing business at the time of initial affixations. The institution or entity shall keep on file a record of the efforts made to locate such owners for inspection by appropriate governmental agencies.

(i) This section applies only to those articles that were initially mastered prior to
 February 15, 1972.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 433.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

653i.

Any person who is involved in a skiing accident and who leaves the scene of the accident knowing or having reason to believe that any other person involved in the accident is in need of medical and other assistance, except to notify the proper authorities or to obtain assistance, shall be guilty of an infraction punishable by fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 870.)
-------------------------------------------

653j.

(a) Every person 18 years of age or older who, in any voluntary manner, solicits, induces, encourages, or intimidates any minor with the intent that the minor shall commit a felony in violation of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 136.1 or Section 187, 211, 215, 245, 246, 451, 459, or 520 of the Penal Code, or Section 10851 of the Vehicle Code, shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for a period of three, five, or seven years. If the minor is 16 years of age or older at the time of the offense, this section shall only apply when the adult is at least five years older than the minor at the time the offense is committed.

(b) In no case
 shall the court impose a sentence pursuant to subdivision (a) which exceeds the maximum penalty prescribed for the felony offense for which the minor was solicited, induced, encouraged, or intimidated to commit.

(c) Whenever a sentence is imposed under subdivision (a), the court shall consider the severity of the underlying crime as one of the circumstances in aggravation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 434.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

653m.

(a) Every person who, with intent to annoy, telephones or makes contact by means of an electronic communication device with another and addresses to or about the other person any obscene language or addresses to the other person any threat to inflict injury to the person or property of the person addressed or any member of his or her family, is guilty of a misdemeanor. Nothing in this subdivision shall apply to telephone calls or electronic contacts made in good faith.

(b) Every
 person who, with intent to annoy or harass, makes repeated telephone calls or makes repeated contact by means of an electronic communication device, or makes any combination of calls or contact, to another person is, whether or not conversation ensues from making the telephone call or contact by means of an electronic communication device, guilty of a misdemeanor. Nothing in this subdivision shall apply to telephone calls or electronic contacts made in good faith or during the ordinary course and scope of business.

(c) Any offense committed by use of a telephone may be deemed to have been committed when and where the telephone call or calls were made or received. Any offense committed by use of an electronic communication device or medium, including the Internet, may be deemed to have been committed when and where the electronic communication or communications were originally sent or first viewed by the recipient.

(d) Subdivision (a) or (b) is violated when the person acting with intent to annoy makes a telephone call or contact by means of an electronic communication device requesting a return call and performs the acts prohibited under subdivision (a) or (b) upon receiving the return call.

(e) Subdivision (a) or (b) is violated when a person knowingly permits any telephone or electronic communication under the person’s control to be used for the purposes prohibited by those subdivisions.

(f) If probation is granted, or the execution or imposition of sentence is suspended, for any person convicted under this section, the court may order as a condition of probation that the person participate in counseling.

(g) For purposes of this section, the term “electronic
 communication device” includes, but is not limited to, telephones, cellular phones, computers, video recorders, facsimile machines, pagers, personal digital assistants, smartphones, and any other device that transfers signs, signals, writing, images, sounds, or data. “Electronic communication device” also includes, but is not limited to, videophones, TTY/TDD devices, and all other devices used to aid or assist communication to or from deaf or disabled persons. “Electronic communication” has the same meaning as the term defined in Subsection 12 of Section 2510 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 109, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

653n.

Any person who installs or who maintains after April 1, 1970, any two-way mirror permitting observation of any restroom, toilet, bathroom, washroom, shower, locker room, fitting room, motel room, or hotel room, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

This section does not apply to such areas (a) in state or local public penal, correctional, custodial, or medical institutions which are used by, or for the treatment of, persons who are committed or voluntarily confined to such institutions or voluntarily receive treatment therein; (b) in private custodial or medical institutions, which are used by, or for
 the treatment of, persons who are committed or voluntarily confined to such institutions or voluntarily receive treatment therein; (c) in public or private treatment facilities which are used by, or for the treatment of, persons who are committed or voluntarily confined to such facilities or voluntarily receive treatment therein; (d) in buildings operated by state or local law enforcement agencies; or (e) in public or private educational institutions.

“Two-way mirror” as used in this section means a mirror or other surface which permits any person on one side thereof to see through it under certain conditions of lighting, while any person on the other side thereof or other surface at that time can see only the usual mirror or other surface reflection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 428.)
-------------------------------------------

653o.

(a) It is unlawful to import into this state for commercial purposes, to possess with intent to sell, or to sell within the state, the dead body, or a part or product thereof, of a polar bear, leopard, ocelot, tiger, cheetah, jaguar, sable antelope, wolf (Canis lupus), zebra, whale, cobra, python, sea turtle, colobus monkey, kangaroo, vicuna, sea otter, free-roaming feral horse, dolphin or porpoise (Delphinidae), Spanish lynx, or elephant.
